Utah statutes.
72-3-205.   State park access highways -- Palisade State Park to Starvation State Park.

State park access highways include:

(1)  PALISADE STATE PARK.  Access to the Palisade State Park begins in Sanpete County at State Highway 89 and proceeds northeasterly on a county road a distance of 2.2 miles to the golf club/contact station at the park and is under the jurisdiction of Sanpete County.

(2)  PIONEER TRAILS STATE PARK.  Access to Pioneer Trails State Park is at the park entrance in Salt Lake County at 2601 East Sunnyside Avenue in Salt Lake City.  No access road is defined.

(3)  PIUTE STATE PARK.  Access to the Piute State Park begins in Piute County at State Highway 89 and proceeds southeasterly on a county road a distance of 1.0 miles to the parking area at the park and is under the jurisdiction of Piute County.

(4)  QUAIL CREEK STATE PARK.  Access to the Quail Creek State Park begins in Washington County at State Highway 9 and proceeds northerly on State Highway 318 a distance of 2.2 miles to the pay gate/contact station at the park and is under the jurisdiction of UDOT.

(5)  RED FLEET STATE PARK.  Access to the Red Fleet State Park begins in Uintah County at State Highway 191 and proceeds easterly on a county road a distance of 2.0 miles to the pay gate at the park and is under the jurisdiction of Uintah County.

(6)  ROCKPORT STATE PARK.  Access to the Rockport State Park begins in Summit County at State Highway 32 and proceeds northwesterly on State Highway 302 a distance of 0.2 miles to the pay gate at the park and is under the jurisdiction of UDOT.

(7)  SCOFIELD (Mountain View).  Access to Scofield Mountain View is at the boat launch in Carbon County at milepoint 9.2 on State Highway 96.  No access road is defined.

(8)  SCOFIELD STATE PARK (Madsen Bay).  Access to the Scofield State Park Madsen Bay is at the park entrance in Carbon County at milepoint 12.3 on State Highway 96.  No access road is defined.

(9)  SNOW CANYON STATE PARK.  Access to the Snow Canyon State Park begins in Washington County at State Highway 18 near mile post 4 in St.  George west on the Tuacahn Parkway to Federal Route 3200 then north on Federal Route 3200 to the south boundary of the Snow Canyon State Park.

(10)  STARVATION STATE PARK.  Access to the Starvation State Park begins in Duchesne County at State Highway 40 and proceeds northwesterly on State Highway 311 a distance of 2.2 miles to the boat ramp at the park and is under the jurisdiction of UDOT.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

